dictsource/kok_rules
// Kankani Language.
// This kok_rules file is prepared by Him Prasad Gautam < drishtibachak@gmail.com >.
// This file is UTF-8 encoded.

// letter groups:
// A - Independent and Dependent Vowels:
//	0x904 to 0x914, 0x93E to 0x94D, 0x950, 0x960 to 0x963, 0x972
// B - Dependent Vowels and Halanta:
//	0x93E to 0x94C, 0x94d, 0x962, 0x963
// C - Consonants:
//	0x915 to 0x939, 0x958 to 0x95F, 0x97B, 0x97c, 0x97E, 0x97F
//    Independent Vowels:
//	0x904 to 0x914, 0x950,0x960, 0x961, 0x977
//  Nepali Alphabets:	0x901 to 0x980
//  Numbers:	0x966 to 096F
//  symbols:
//	0x901 to 0x903, 0x93C, 0x93D, 0x951 to 0x954, 0x964, 0x965, 0x970, 0x971, 0x97D

// conditional rules
// ?2   use diphthong for "ai"
// ?3   use diphthong for "au"

.replace
 ०	0
 १	1
 २	2
 ३	3
 ४	4
 ५	5
 ६	6
 ७	7
 ८	8
 ९	9

 ॱ०	.0
 ॱ१	.1
 ॱ२	.2
 ॱ३	.3
 ॱ४	.4
 ॱ५	.5
 ॱ६	.6
 ॱ७	.7
 ॱ८	.8
 ॱ९	.9

.group ॱ	//Devanagari decimal
	ॱ	d'VS'V,mal'Vw#@

// Vowels

.group अ
	अ	V
	अ (_	V:0
	अं	V~
	अं (_	V~:

.group आ
	आ	a:
	आ (_	a::0
	आं	a~
	आं (_	a~::0

.group इ
	इ	I
	इ (_	I:0
	इं	i~
	इं (_	i~::

.group ई
	ई	i:
	ई (_	i::0
	ईं	i~
	ईं (_	i~::

.group उ
	उ	U
	उ (_	U:0
	उं	U~
	उं (_	U~:

.group ऊ
	ऊ	u:
	ऊं	u~
	ऊं (_	u~:

.group ऋ
	ऋ	rI

.group ॠ
	ॠ	ri:

.group ऌ
	ऌ	lr-'i

.group ऍ
	ऍ	E	// candra e

.group ऎ
	ऎ	e
	ऎं	e~
	ऎं (_	e~:

.group ए
	ए	e:
	एँ	e~:
	एं	e~:

.group ऐ
	ऐ	E:	// ?? [aI] [E:] [&:]
	ऐं	E~
	ऐँ (_	E~:
?2	ऐ	aI	// ?? [aI] [E:] [&:]

.group ऑ
	ऑ	O	// candra O

.group ऒ
	ऒ	o
	ऒं	o~
	ऒं (_	o~:

.group ओ
	ओ	o:
	ओं	o~
	ओं (_	o~:	// +candrabindu

.group औ
	औ	O:	// ?? [aU] [O:]
	औं	O~	// +anusvara
	औं (_	O~:
?3	औ	aU	// ?? [aU] [O:]


// Vowel Signs

.group ा
	ा	a:k'a:r
	C) ा	a:
	C) ा (ँ	a~
	C) ाँ (_	a~:1
	C) ा (ं	a~

.group ि
	ि	I,k'a:r
	C) ि	I
	C) ि (_	I:0
	C) ि (ं	i~
	C) ि (ं_	i~:

.group ी
	ी	i:,k'a:r
	C) ी	i:
	C) ी (_	i::0
	C) ी (ँ	i~
	C) ीँ (_	i~:1
	C) ी (ं	i~

.group ु
	ु	U,k'a:r
	C) ु	U
	C) ु (_	U:0
		C) ु (ँ	u~
	C) ुं	u~
	C) ुँ (_	u~:1

.group ू
	ू	u:k'a:r
	C) ू	u:
	C) ू (_	u::0
	C) ू (C	u:
	C) ू (ँ	u~
	C) ूं	u~
	C) ूँ (_	u~:1

.group ृ
	ृ	rI,k'a:r
	C) ृ	rI
	C) ृ (_	rI:0
.group ॄ
	ॄ	rI:,k'a:r
	C) ॄ	rI:

.group ॅ
	ॅ	E,k'a:r
	C) ॅ	E

.group ॆ
	ॆ	e,k'a:r
	C) ॆ	e
	C) ॆ (_	e':0
	C) ॆ (ँ	e~
	C) ॆ (ं	e~
	C) ॆँ (_	e~:1

.group े
	े	e:,k'a:r
	C) े	e:
	C) े (_	e:':0
	C) े (ँ	e~
	C) े (ं	e~:
	C) ेँ (_	e~:1

.group ै
	ै	E:,k'a:r
	C) ै	E:
	C) ै (_	E::0
	C) ै (ं	E~ 
	C) ै (ँ	E~
	C) ैँ (_	E~:1
?2	C) ै	aI

.group ॉ
	ॉ	O,k'a:r
	C) ॉ	O
	C) ॉ (_	O':0
.group ॊ
	ॊ	o,k'a:r
	C) ॊ	o
	C) ॊ (_	o':0
	C) ॊ (ँ	o~
	C) ॊं	o~
	C) ॊँ (_	o~:1

.group ो
	ो	o:,k'a:r
	C) ो	o:
	C) ो (_	o::0
	C) ो (ँ	o~
	C) ों	o~
	C) ोँ (_	o~:1

.group ौ
	ौ	O:,k'a:r
	C) ौ	O:	//  [O:] or [aU] ??
	C) ौ (_	O::0
	C) ौ (ँ	O~	//  [O:] or [aU] ??
	C) ौं	O~
	C) ौँ (_	O~:1
?3	C) ौ	aU

.group ॢ	// vowel sign l
	ॢ	l-,rik'a:r

.group ॣ    // vowel sign ll
	ॣ	l-:rik'a:r

.group ॐ
	ॐ	o~m

// Consonants

.group क
	क	kV
	क (B	k
	क (्य	k:
	क़	qV
	क़ (B	q
	क्क	k:V   // kk -> k:
	क्क (B	k:
	क्ष	kSV
	क्ष (B	kS

.group ख
	ख	k#V
	ख (B	k#
	ख़	xV
	ख़ (B	x

.group ग
	ग	gV
	ग (B	g
	ग़	QV
	ग़ (B	Q

.group घ
	घ	g#V
	घ (B	g#

.group ङ
	ङ	NV
	ङ (B	N
	्) ङ (_	N@

.group च
	च	cV
	च (B	c
	च (्य	c:

.group छ
	छ	c#V
	छ (B	c#

.group ज
	ज	JV
	ज (B	J
	ज़	zV
	ज़ (B	z
	ज्ञ	n'jV
	ज्ञ (B	nj

.group झ
	झ	J#V
	झ (B	J#

.group ञ
	ञ	n^V
	ञ (B	n^
	्) ञ (_	n^@

.group ट
	ट	t.V
	ट (B	t.
	ट (्य	t.:
	ट्ट	t.:V    // t.t. -> t.:
	ट्ट (B	t.:
	ट्ठ	t.#:V    // t.t.# -> t.#:
	ट्ठ (B	t.#:

.group ठ
	ठ	t.#V
	ठ (B	t.#
	
	ठ्ठ	t.#:V   // t.#t.# -> t.#:
	ठ्ठ (B	t.#:
	
.group ड
	ड	d.V
	ड (B	d.

	ड़	r.V
	ड़ (B	r.

.group ढ
	ढ	d.#V
	ढ (B	d.#
	ढ़	r.hV
	ढ़ (B	r.h	// nukta

.group ण
	ण	n.V
	ण (B	n.
	्) ण (_	n.@

.group त
	त	tV
	त (B	t
	त (्य	t:
	त्र_	t@
	त्त	t:V   // tt -> t:
	त्त (B	t:

.group थ
	थ	t#V
	थ (B	t#
	थ (_	t#@

.group द
	द	dV
	द (B	d

.group ध
	ध	d#V
	ध (B	d#

.group न
	न	nV
	न (B	n
	्) न (_	n@
    र्) न (_	n	// r +virama


.group ऩ
	ऩ	n:	// should this be a long [n] ?

.group प
	प	pV
	प (B	p
	प (्य	p:1
	प्प	p:1V
	प्प (B	p:1

.group फ
	फ	p#V
	फ (B	p#
	फ़	fV
	फ़ (B	f

.group ब
	ब	bV
	ब (B	b

.group भ
	भ	b#V
	भ (B	b#

.group म
	म	mV
	म (B	m
	्) म (_	m@
	र्) म (_	m:0
    न्) म (_	m:0

.group य
	य	jV
	य (B	j
	C) य (_	Ej
	य (_	j@
	्) य (C	j@

.group र
	र	rV
	र (B	r
	र (_	r
	्) र (_	r@

.group ऱ
	ऱ	rV
	ऱ (B	r
	्) ऱ (_	r@

.group ल
	ल	lV
	ल (B	l
	्) ल (_	l@

.group ळ
	ळ	l.V
	ळ (B	l.
	्) ळ (_	l.@

.group ऴ
	ऴ	l.V	// (temporary) same as [l.]
	ऴ (B	l.
	्) ऴ (_	l.@

.group व
	व	wV
	व (B	w
	_) व	wV
	_) व (B	w
	_) व (्	w
	व (_	w@
	्) व	w:0V
	्) व (_	w@
	व (्य	b

.group श
	श	SV
	श (B	S

.group ष
	ष	s.V 
	ष (B	s.

.group स
	स	sV:
	स (B	s

.group ह
	ह	HV
	ह (B	H
	ह (व	H'V:
		// Additional consonants

.group क़   // qa
	क़	qV
	क़ (B	q

.group ख़   // khha
	ख़	xV
	ख़ (B	x

.group ग़    // ghha
	ग़	QV
	ग़ (B	Q

.group ज़    // za
	ज़	zV
	ज़ (B	z

.group ड़
	ड़	r.V
	ड़ (B	r.

.group ढ़
	ढ़	r.hV
	ढ़ (B	r.h

.group फ़    // fa
	फ़	fV
	फ़ (B	f

.group य़
	य़	jV
	य़ (B	j

			// Alphabetic symbols			
			//	nukta,  modifies a consonant

.group ऽ	// avagraha, lengthens a vowel ??
	ऽ	V'k'a:r@
	A) ऽ	:=
	C) ऽ	:=

.group ँ
	ँ	cVndr@2wi'n'du
	A) ँ	n
	C) ँ	n
	्) ँ	cVndr@2wi'n'du

.group ं
	ं	shI'rV,w'in'd'u
	// After a vowel sign the vowel rule already made it nasal (सुकें [sukɛ̃]),
	// so at word end and before a non-stop the anusvara adds nothing.
	A) ं (_	
	A) ं (य	
	A) ं (र	
	A) ं (ल	
	A) ं (व	
	A) ं (स	
	A) ं (श	
	A) ं (ह	
	A) ं	n
	C) ं	n
	ं (प	m
	ं (फ	m
	ं (ब	m
	ं (भ	m
	ं (म	m
	ं (ट	n.
	ं (ठ	n.
	ं (ड	n.
	ं (ढ	n.
	ं (ण	n.
	ं (च	n^
	ं (छ	n^
	ं (ज	n^
	ं (ज्ञ	N
	ं (झ	n^
	ं (ञ	n^
	ं (य	n^
	ं (क	N
	ं (ख	N
	ं (ग	N
	ं (घ	N
	ं (ङ	N
	ं (ह	N

.group ः
	ः	wi:s'Vr,g@
	_) ः	:	//wi:s'Vr,g@
	C) ः (_	H
	A) ः (_	H,
	C) ः (A	H,
	A) ः (C	H,
	A) ः (A	H,
	C) ः (C	H,

.group ्
	्	h'Vl@3n't@2 // Alphabet Name
	C) ्		// Silent If followed to a Consonant.
	C) ् (C_	=

.group ॰
	॰	saNks.e:p@s'u:c@k@
	A) ॰	,:0
	C) ॰	,:0

		// Special Symbols with special meanings
.group
	।	pur',n.@:w'ir'a:m	// Fullstop in Devanagari
	॥	d'i:rg#@,w'ir'a:m	// Double Fullstop - means Read sentence twice.
	$	dOlV
	%	prVtish'vt
	// Rarely used  Vedic  symbols. Written after Indepedent Vowel or between a Consonants and Symbolic Vowels!
	़	n'u'k't'a:
	॑	Ud'Vtt,@
	॓	Ud:d#@r,@n.@a:r'Vmb#@
	॔	,Ud:d#@r,@n.@'Vnt@
	॒	a'n'ud'Vtt,@ 
	ॽ	k,@n.t.#@w'Ira:m
